Missouri, session 2026, HB2221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 226, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 226.032, to read as follows:
226.032. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when
preparing the statewide transportation improvement program (STIP), the department
of transportation shall prioritize the high priority corridors identified in Section 1105(c)
of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991, Pub. L. 102-240.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any proposed
amendments to the STIP within the implementation period shall be approved by the
joint committee on administrative rules.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.